Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 204C.15, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Outside the polling place. An individual who is unable to enter a polling place where paper ballots or an electronic voting system are used may register or update the voter's registration and vote without leaving a motor vehicle. Two election judges who are members of different major political parties must assist the voter to register or to update a registration, as applicable, and to complete a voter's certificate and must provide the necessary ballots. The voter may request additional assistance in marking ballots as provided in subdivision 1.new text begin Election judges providing assistance under this subdivision may only handle one voted ballot at a time.new text end